Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-314
Provisional alcohol and drug counselor; license requirements.

To be licensed to practice as a provisional alcohol and drug counselor, an applicant shall:

(1) Have a high school diploma or its equivalent;

(2) Have two hundred seventy hours of education related to the knowledge and skills of alcohol and drug counseling which shall include:

(a) A minimum of forty-five hours in counseling theories and techniques coursework;

(b) A minimum of forty-five hours in group counseling coursework;

(c) A minimum of thirty hours in human growth and development coursework;

(d) A minimum of fifteen hours in professional ethics and issues coursework;

(e) A minimum of thirty hours in alcohol and drug assessment, case planning, and management coursework;

(f) A minimum of thirty hours in multicultural counseling coursework;

(g) A minimum of forty-five hours in medical and psychosocial aspects of alcohol and drug use, abuse, and addiction coursework; and

(h) A minimum of thirty hours in clinical treatment issues in chemical dependency coursework; and

(3) Have supervised practical training which shall:

(a) Include performing a minimum of three hundred hours in the counselor core functions in a work setting where alcohol and drug counseling is provided;

(b) Be a formal, systematic process that focuses on skill development and integration of knowledge;

(c) Include training hours documented by performance date and core function performance areas; and

(d) Include the performance of all counselor core functions with no single function performed less than ten hours.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 119;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,355;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 165.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.